Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Chapter 1

General Provisions

9-1-101. Fiscal year for state and county government.

The fiscal year of state government shall hereafter commence on July 1 of each year and end on the following June 30. This fiscal year shall be followed in making appropriations and in financial reporting, and shall be uniformly adopted by all departments, institutions, offices and agencies of state government.

Unless otherwise allowed by the comptroller of the treasury upon grounds of special hardships, the fiscal year of the counties of the state shall begin on July 1 of each year and shall end on the following June 30. The fiscal year shall constitute the budget year and the year for accounting and reporting of each and every fund, office, department, institution, activity and agency of the county government, but the aforementioned provision shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any accounting and reporting now required of any official by general law.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 27; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.27; Acts 1957, ch. 311, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-101.

Cross-References. Fiscal year under county budgeting law, §5-12-105.

9-1-102. Borrowing by state employees and officials restricted.

State employees and officials are prohibited from borrowing money upon the faith and credit of the state for any purpose whatever, except as otherwise provided by law.

Acts 1877, ch. 56, § 1; Shan., § 241a1; Code 1932, § 184; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-102; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 2.

9-1-103. Protection of appropriations of state and departmental revenues and state funds and institutional and program revenues by the state's sovereign immunity.

Except to the extent that sovereign immunity is expressly waived by the general assembly, all appropriations of state revenues and departmental revenues previously and hereafter made to the state, its departments, agencies, boards, educational institutions, instrumentalities, and incorporated entities performing the state's governmental functions shall be state funds and shall be protected by the state's sovereign immunity from every court's judgment, decree, attachment, or other legal process; provided, however, that any law authorizing an agency, board, or entity to sue or be sued shall not constitute a waiver of sovereign immunity.

Except to the extent that sovereign immunity is expressly waived by the general assembly, all appropriations of state funds and institutional and program revenues previously and hereafter made to institutions and programs of higher education shall be state funds and shall be protected by the state's sovereign immunity from any court's judgment, decree, attachment, or other legal process; provided, however, that any law authorizing an institution or program of higher education to sue or be sued shall not constitute a waiver of sovereign immunity.

Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 31; 2014, ch. 917, §§ 1, 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 31 purported to enact a new §9-1-120. The section was enacted as §9-1-103 under the authority of the code commission.

9-1-104. Right of prepayment to appear on instrument.

Whenever the right to pay, prior to maturity, bonds, notes or other obligations of the state of Tennessee, or political subdivisions thereof, exists, the fact of such right of prepayment shall appear on the face of the instrument, or on the reverse side thereof, in a prominent place.

Acts 1947, ch. 67, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 1811.7 (Williams, § 1811.31); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-104.

9-1-105. State-shared revenue to counties and municipalities — Effective date for distribution purposes.

For the purpose of distributing state-shared revenue to counties and municipalities based upon the population as disclosed by the last federal decennial census, the effective date of such federal decennial census for counties shall be the first day of the month next following the date on which the federal bureau of the census releases the final population figures for all Tennessee counties, and the effective date for municipalities shall be the first day of the month next following the date on which the federal bureau of the census releases the final population figures for all Tennessee municipalities.

Acts 1955, ch. 60, § 1; T.C.A., § 9-105.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Census, § 1.

9-1-106. Negotiability of public bonds.

The negotiability of all bonds issued by this state, any county, municipal corporation or other subdivision or public agency thereof shall be governed by the Uniform Commercial Code — Investment Securities, compiled in title 47, chapter 8, any other statute to the contrary notwithstanding.

Acts 1963, ch. 152, § 1; T.C.A., § 9-106.

9-1-107. Investments or deposits in federal savings banks or pooled investment fund — Deposits exceeding insurance limits.

Counties, municipalities, districts, and other public or quasi-public corporations and public officials, boards, agencies, or other public or quasi-public entities, other than the state, are expressly authorized and empowered to invest or deposit funds held by them, including sinking funds and pension and retirement funds in accounts of federal savings banks, whose deposits are insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation.

Deposits in excess of the limits of insurance on such accounts are authorized where the collateral given is of the character set forth in § 9-4-103, or where the collateral given is an irrevocable letter of credit issued by the federal savings bank, or where the collateral consists of a promissory note secured by a first mortgage or a first deed of trust upon residential real property located in Tennessee; provided, that:

The promissory note shall at all times be in an amount in value at least fifty percent (50%) in excess of the amount deposited with the bank, such value to be determined in accordance with procedures established by regulations hereby authorized to be issued by the comptroller of the treasury;

The bank may exercise, enforce, or waive any right or power granted to it by promissory note, mortgage, or deed of trust; provided, that the security for the note shall not be released or diminished in value by such action;

The following may not be used as security for deposits:

Any promissory note on which any payment is more than ninety (90) days past due;

Any promissory note secured by a mortgage or deed of trust as to which there is a lien prior to the mortgage or deed of trust; or

Any promissory note secured by a mortgage or deed of trust as to which notice of default has been recorded or an action has been commenced. In addition, no promissory note on which payment is more than thirty (30) days past due shall be used initially as such security;

If the security or any note is released, or if the note is diminished in value by action of the bank as set forth in subdivision (a)(2)(B), or if any note becomes delinquent as set forth in subdivision (a)(2)(C), or if for any other reason the value of the note or security is impaired, the bank shall promptly substitute collateral meeting the requirements hereof sufficient to cover the deposits to be secured hereunder; and

Such deposits in excess of the limits of insurance shall, as to each bank, be limited to no more than five percent (5%) of the assets of such bank with respect to each depositor hereunder, and shall be limited to no more than ten percent (10%) of the assets of such association with respect to all depositors hereunder.

Counties, municipalities, districts and other public or quasi-public entities are authorized to deposit or invest funds in the local government investment pool under chapter 4, part 7 of this title. The governing body of such local government may delegate revocable investment authority to the financial officer charged with custody of the funds of the local government, who shall thereafter assume full responsibility for transactions with the local government investment pool.

Acts 1969, ch. 181, § 1; 1977, ch. 205, § 1; 1979, ch. 111, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 5.26; T.C.A., § 9-107; Acts 1984, ch. 627, § 1; 1985, ch. 118, § 4.

Cross-References. Savings and loan associations, title 45, ch. 3.

Tennessee consolidated retirement system, title 8, chs. 34-37.

9-1-108. Collection of funds on behalf of the state or local government — Acceptance of checks or money orders — Acceptance of credit or debit cards.

It is lawful for any municipal, county or state officer to receive, in payment of any public taxes, licenses, fines, fees or other moneys collected, checks or money orders made payable to the appropriate municipal official, county officer or to the “State of Tennessee.” If a check or money order so received is not duly paid, the person by whom such check or money order has been tendered shall remain liable for the payment of the tax, license, fee or other obligation, and for all legal penalties and/or interest, to the same extent as if such check or money order had not been tendered.

It is lawful for any public official who collects funds on behalf of the state or any local government to receive checks in such public official's official capacity made payable either to the individual public office or to the individual person's name who holds such public office; provided, that it is unlawful for any such public official to instruct the public to make such checks payable to the individual person's name who holds such public office on any notice sent to the public to collect such funds. This subsection (b) applies only to any county with a metropolitan form of government and is controlling if in conflict with any county or local ordinance to the contrary.

It is lawful for any municipal or county entity or officer to receive payment by credit card or debit card for any public taxes, licenses, fines, fees or other moneys collected by such municipal or county entity or officer.

As used in this subsection (c), unless the context otherwise requires:

“Credit card” has the same meaning as defined in § 47-22-101;

“Debit card” has the same meaning as defined in § 39-14-102; and

“Municipal or county entity” includes, but is not limited to, a municipality, county, metropolitan government, utility district, board, commission or authority created or authorized by general or local law.

Any municipal or county entity or officer collecting payment by credit card or debit card pursuant to this subsection (c) shall set and collect a processing fee in an amount that is equal to the amount paid the third party processor for processing the payment. Such processing fee may be waived by approval of the governing body.

If a payment by credit card is not honored by the credit card company issuing the card, or if a payment by a debit card is not honored by the entity on which the funds are drawn, the municipal or county governmental entity or officer may collect a service charge from the person who owes the municipal or county tax, fee, fine, penalty, interest or other charge, for processing the transaction. The amount of the service charge shall be the same amount as the fee charged for the collection of a check drawn on an account with insufficient funds; provided, that this service charge shall not apply nor be collected if an electronic device is used to conduct the transaction, the card and card holder are present, and the officer learns of the declination of the credit card or debit card at the time the transaction is processed.

The municipal or county entity or officer collecting funds through payment by a credit card or debit card shall state on any notice to the person owing the tax, fine, fee or other money either the percentage of the processing fee for use of a credit card or debit card or the actual fee imposed for the use of a credit card or debit card.

Acts 1969, ch. 303, § 1; T.C.A., § 9-108; Acts 1989, ch. 480, § 1; 1992, ch. 962, § 1; 2000, ch. 706, § 1; 2001, ch. 348, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 621, § 1.

Cross-References. Collection of taxes, title 67, ch. 1, part 7; title 67, ch. 5, part 18.

Use of personal name as payee prohibited, §9-1-117.

9-1-109. Penalties for nonpayment of checks or money orders.

If any check or money order so received is not duly paid, in addition to other penalties provided by law, there shall be paid as a penalty by the person who tendered such check or money order, upon written notice and demand by the state, county or municipal officer to whom such check was tendered, an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the amount of such check or money order, except that if the amount of the check or money order is less than two thousand dollars ($2,000), the penalty under this section shall be twenty dollars ($20.00) or the amount of the check, whichever is lesser.

Acts 1969, ch. 303, § 2; T.C.A., § 9-109; Acts 1992, ch. 962, § 2.

9-1-110. Issuance of credit by commissioner of revenue for taxes, licenses or fees of amounts received by check or money order.

In the event any such check or money order is not duly paid, after acceptance by any municipal, county or state officer as payment of any taxes, licenses or fees in good faith and with reason to believe the same would be duly paid, the commissioner may give credit in such manner as such commissioner may prescribe to the officer for such amount included in the check or money order tendered as payment of taxes, licenses or fees due to the state.

Acts 1969, ch. 303, § 3; T.C.A., § 9-110.

9-1-111. Report on federal receipts by designated state agencies. [Repealed effective July 1, 2024.]

For purposes of this section:

“Designated state agency” means:

Department of agriculture;

Department of financial institutions;

Department of environment and conservation;

Department of correction;

Department of economic and community development;

Department of education;

Board of trustees of the University of Tennessee;

Board of regents of the state university and community college system;

Local governing boards of trustees of state universities;

Department of general services;

Department of human services;

Department of commerce and insurance;

Department of labor and workforce development;

Department of mental health and substance abuse services;

Department of human resources;

Department of health;

Department of revenue;

Department of safety;

Department of tourist development;

Department of transportation;

Department of the treasury;

Department of veterans services;

The military department; and

Bureau of TennCare;

“Federal receipts” means the federal financial assistance, as defined in 31 U.S.C. § 7501, that is reported as part of a single audit; and

“Single audit” has the same meaning as defined in 31 U.S.C. § 7501.

Subject to subsections (c) and (d), a designated state agency shall for each year designated in subsection (g), on or before October 31, prepare a report that:

Reports the aggregate value of federal receipts the designated state agency received for the preceding fiscal year;

Reports the aggregate amount of federal funds appropriated by the general assembly to the designated state agency for the preceding fiscal year;

Calculates the percentage of the designated state agency's total budget for the preceding fiscal year that constitutes federal receipts that the designated state agency received for that fiscal year; and

Develops plans for operating the designated state agency if there is a reduction of:

Five percent (5%) in the federal receipts that the designated state agency receives;

Twenty-five percent (25%) in the federal receipts that the designated state agency receives; and

One hundred percent (100%) in the federal receipts that the designated state agency receives.

The report required by subsection (b) that the department of education prepares must include the information required by subdivisions (b)(1)-(3) for each school district, including special school districts, and each charter school within the public education system.

Each designated state agency that prepares a report in accordance with subsection (b) shall submit the report to the department of finance and administration on or before November 1 of each year designated by subsection (g).

The department of finance and administration shall, on or before November 30 of each year designated by subsection (g), prepare a report that:

Compiles and summarizes the reports the department of finance and administration receives in accordance with subsection (d); and

Compares the aggregate value of federal receipts each designated state agency received for the previous fiscal year to the aggregate amount of federal funds appropriated by the general assembly to that designated state agency for that fiscal year.

The department of finance and administration shall, as part of the report required by subdivision (e)(1), compile a list of designated state agencies that do not submit a report as required by this section.

The department of finance and administration shall submit the report required by subsection (e) to the chairs of the finance, ways and means committees of the house of representatives and the senate on or before January 15 of each year following the year designated by subsection (g).

Reports required by this section must be prepared in 2019, 2021, and 2023.

This section is repealed on July 1, 2024.

Acts 2019, ch. 480, § 1; 2020, ch. 626, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (a)(1)(X).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 626, § 2. March 19, 2020.

9-1-112 — 9-1-115. [Reserved.]

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, availability of programs and services to people in this state shall be limited to the extent that funds are appropriated by the general assembly or the appropriate governing body of a political subdivision.

No person shall be entitled to have made available to such person, or otherwise be entitled to, any program or any services provided by or through the state, its departments, agencies or political subdivisions unless funds remain available for such program or service from moneys appropriated for that purpose by the general assembly or the appropriate governing body of a political subdivision.

Acts 1982, ch. 549, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The following sections contain specific appropriations or create obligations that may be affected by this section:2-2-136,2-4-108,2-5-217,2-6-312,2-9-112,2-9-113,2-12-108,3-7-101,4-3-1008,4-3-2207,4-3-2208,4-3-5004,4-6-113,4-6-115,4-6-131,4-6-143,4-7-111,4-7-112,4-9-104,4-11-102,4-12-106,4-13-305,4-14-107,4-15-103,4-21-202,4-21-311,4-24-202,8-1-106,8-6-105,8-6-106,8-6-109,8-7-202,8-7-306,8-26-101,8-26-103,8-26-104,8-26-106,8-26-112,8-26-114,8-27-201 [now see § 8-27-203],8-30-105,8-34-304,8-34-312,8-34-403,8-37-402,8-38-116,8-39-102,8-39-104,8-42-104,8-42-107,8-46-205,9-8-112,11-4-401,11-14-201,12-1-105,12-1-106,13-3-103,13-10-107,13-10-109,13-11-105,13-11-107,13-14-111,13-14-113,13-20-303,33-1-202,33-2-1104,33-3-503,33-9-204,37-1-150,37-2-303,38-7-102,38-8-111,38-8-205,40-14-207,40-14-209,40-14-304,40-14-305,40-14-311,40-14-312,40-14-314,40-17-112,40-17-208,40-23-104,40-23-107,40-24-106,40-25-111,40-25-112,40-25-129,40-25-130,40-25-131,40-25-132,40-25-139,40-25-140,40-25-141,40-28-106,40-28-117,40-28-122,40-33-110,41-2-119,41-2-133,41-4-115,41-4-139,41-8-106,41-21-219,43-6-105,43-21-111,49-3-101,49-3-306,49-3-309,49-3-310,49-3-311,49-3-312,49-3-313,49-4-704,49-6-3001,49-6-3003,49-6-3104,49-6-4404,49-7-102,49-7-113,49-8-112,49-10-101,49-10-103,49-10-113,49-11-610,49-11-803,50-3-102,50-7-504,54-5-201,54-5-804,58-1-109,58-1-230,58-2-113,58-2-115,58-4-102,67-1-508,68-5-105,68-12-111,68-35-101,68-35-103,68-41-102,68-49-101,68-140-103,71-2-301,71-3-612,71-4-605,71-5-106,71-5-201,71-5-305,71-5-311,71-5-312,71-5-2101,71-5-2104,71-5-2311,71-6-107,71-6-109.

9-1-117. Receipt or collection of personal checks by state, municipal or county officials.

An official or employee within state, county, or municipal government or any agency thereof, who is required or authorized to receive or collect personal checks or similar sight orders on behalf of such government, agency or office, shall not require or encourage the drawer of any such check or order to give or include as payee any personal name as opposed to the name of the state, county, or municipal government or the agency or office or the official's name and title. Such official or employee shall not require or encourage any such drawer to give or include as payee the name of any official, employee, or other person in such person's personal capacity. This section shall not be construed or implemented to prohibit use of notification forms which were printed prior to May 8, 1996.

Acts 1996, ch. 909, § 1.

Cross-References. Use of personal name as payee prohibited, §9-1-108.

Law Reviews.

1996 Real Estate Legislation: What You Don't Know Can Hurt You (William R. Bruce), 32 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1996).

9-1-118. Depositing, investing or placing for deposit funds held by state and government entities.

In addition to other investments authorized by law, and notwithstanding any other law, the state and other government entities, including counties, municipalities, districts, and other public or quasi-public corporations and public officials, boards, agencies, or other public or quasi-public entities, are expressly authorized and empowered to deposit, invest or place for deposit funds held by them, including sinking funds and pension and retirement funds, in accordance with the following conditions:

The funds are initially deposited, invested, or placed for deposit through a bank or savings and loan association with a branch in Tennessee authorized to accept deposits that is selected by the government entity;

To prevent deposits from exceeding the insurance coverage provided by the federal deposit insurance corporation (FDIC), the government entity making the deposit shall provide the selected depository with written notification of the names of all banks and savings and loan associations that are holding funds, other than funds deposited or placed in accordance with this section on behalf of the governmental entity, and on behalf of any department, agency, or other instrumentality having the same federal employer identification number (FEIN) as the governmental entity;

The selected depository arranges for the deposit of the moneys, in one (1) or more federally insured banks or savings and loan associations, wherever located, for the account of the government entity; provided, that the selected depository shall not arrange for the deposit of the moneys with any bank or savings and loan association listed in the notification provided by the government entity, pursuant to subdivision (a)(2);

The full amount of principal and any accrued interest of each such deposit is insured by the FDIC;

The selected depository is authorized to and acts as custodian for the government entity with respect to such deposit issued for its account, or if uncertified deposits, books and records evidencing the deposit; and

At the same time that the government entity funds are deposited, the selected depository receives an amount of federally insured deposits from customers of other financial institutions, wherever located, equal to or greater than the amount of the funds initially invested by the government entity through the selected depository.

To the extent insured by applicable federal deposit insurance, funds invested, deposited or placed for deposit in accordance with the conditions prescribed in this section shall not be subject to any additional security or collateral that may be applicable to the deposit or investment of public funds.

Any funds invested, deposited or placed for deposit that are not covered by federal deposit insurance shall be collateralized in the same manner as state deposits, as provided in chapter 4 of this title, or in the collateral pool as provided in chapter 4, part 5 of this title.

The selected depository shall not utilize any organization to perform or otherwise provide the services under this section, unless the state treasurer has approved the organization's request to perform such services. Such approval by the state treasurer shall be submitted to the commissioners of financial institutions and finance and administration for their concurrence.

This investment is subject to the approval of the state funding board for investments made by the state treasurer. This investment is subject to the approval of the respective boards of the University of Tennessee and the board of regents for their systems. For political subdivision officials responsible for investing funds of local governments, this investment is subject to the approval of the appropriate committee, that being the investment committee or the finance committee.

Each authorizing body shall establish policies and procedures for the investments as approved by this section. Such policies and procedures shall include the establishment of appropriate controls to ensure that full FDIC insurance coverage is obtained. Controls may include, but not be limited to, using a single official FEIN or taxpayer identification number (TIN) for deposits made by a public unit as determined by the FDIC.

Acts 2005, ch. 432, § 1; 2012, ch. 544, §§ 1-4.

9-1-119. Computer software as equipment for financing purposes.

Whenever the right to issue debt, whether bonds, notes or other obligations, exists for the state of Tennessee, any corporate governmental agency or instrumentality of the state of Tennessee, any county, city, municipal corporation, or other subdivision or public agency or entity thereof to finance capital assets, computer software, whether acquired before, at the same time as, or after the hardware needed for utilization of the software, to the extent accounted for as a capital asset, shall constitute equipment for financing purposes.

Acts 2005, ch. 248, § 1.

9-1-116. Programs and services limited to extent funds available.